Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-605
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Nebraska Rules of the Road, the definitions found in sections 60-606 to 60-676.01 shall be used.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 101;

Laws 1996, LB 901, § 4;

Laws 1997, LB 91, § 2;

Laws 2001, LB 38, § 43;

Laws 2006, LB 853, § 15;

Laws 2006, LB 925, § 5;

Laws 2008, LB756, § 19;

Laws 2010, LB650, § 36;

Laws 2011, LB289, § 30;

Laws 2012, LB1155, § 19;

Laws 2015, LB231, § 28;

Laws 2018, LB1009, § 4;

Laws 2019, LB81, § 2;

Laws 2019, LB156, § 17;

Laws 2023, LB138, § 36;

Laws 2025, LB530, § 24;

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 80.
July 18, 2026